src/third-party/hunspell-dictionaries/pt.aff
SFX K Y 238
SFX K   ir             o              uir
SFX K   r              o              air
SFX K   r              s              [ua]ir
SFX K   ir             i              [ua]ir
SFX K   ir              mos           [ua]ir
SFX K   ir              s             [ua]ir
SFX K   ir             em             [ua]ir
SFX K   ir              a             [ua]ir
SFX K   ir              as            [ua]ir
SFX K   ir              amos          [ua]ir
SFX K   ir              eis           [ua]ir
SFX K   ir              am            [ua]ir
SFX K   ir                            [ua]ir
SFX K   ir              ste           [ua]ir
SFX K   r              u              [ua]ir
SFX K   ir              mos           [ua]ir
SFX K   ir              stes          [ua]ir
SFX K   ir              ram           [ua]ir
SFX K   ir              ra            [ua]ir
SFX K   ir              ras           [ua]ir
SFX K   ir              ramos         [ua]ir
SFX K   ir              reis          [ua]ir
SFX K   0              ei             [ua]ir
SFX K   0               s             [ua]ir
SFX K   0                             [ua]ir
SFX K   0              emos           [ua]ir
SFX K   0              eis            [ua]ir
SFX K   0               o             [ua]ir
SFX K   ir             a              uir
SFX K   ir             as             uir
SFX K   ir             amos           uir
SFX K   ir             ais            uir
SFX K   ir             am             uir
SFX K   r              a              air
SFX K   r              as             air
SFX K   r              amos           air
SFX K   r              ais            air
SFX K   r              am             air
SFX K   ir              sse           [ua]ir
SFX K   ir              sses          [ua]ir
SFX K   ir              ssemos        [ua]ir
SFX K   ir              sseis         [ua]ir
SFX K   ir              ssem          [ua]ir
SFX K   ir              res           [ua]ir
SFX K   0              mos            [ua]ir
SFX K   ir              rdes          [ua]ir
SFX K   ir              rem           [ua]ir
SFX K   0              ia             [ua]ir
SFX K   0              ias            [ua]ir
SFX K   0               amos          [ua]ir
SFX K   0               eis           [ua]ir
SFX K   0              iam            [ua]ir
SFX K   ir                            [ua]ir
SFX K   r              ndo            [ua]ir
SFX K   ir              do            [^q][ua]ir
SFX K   ir              da            [^q][ua]ir
SFX K   ir              dos           [^q][ua]ir
SFX K   ir              das           [^q][ua]ir
SFX K   ir             ido            quir
SFX K   ir             ida            quir
SFX K   ir             idos           quir
SFX K   ir             idas           quir
SFX K   r              nho            por
SFX K   or              es            por
SFX K   or              e             por
SFX K   r              mos            por
SFX K   r              ndes           por
SFX K   or              em            por
SFX K   or             unha           por
SFX K   or             unhas          por
SFX K   or              nhamos        por
SFX K   or              nheis         por
SFX K   or             unham          por
SFX K   or             us             por
SFX K   or             useste         por
SFX K   or              s             por
SFX K   or             usemos         por
SFX K   or             usestes        por
SFX K   or             useram         por
SFX K   or             usera          por
SFX K   or             useras         por
SFX K   or             us ramos       por
SFX K   or             us reis        por
SFX K   0              ei             por
SFX K   0               s             por
SFX K   0                             por
SFX K   0              emos           por
SFX K   0              eis            por
SFX K   0               o             por
SFX K   r              nha            por
SFX K   r              nhas           por
SFX K   r              nhamos         por
SFX K   r              nhais          por
SFX K   r              nham           por
SFX K   or             usesse         por
SFX K   or             usesses        por
SFX K   or             us ssemos      por
SFX K   or             us sseis       por
SFX K   or             usessem        por
SFX K   or             user           por
SFX K   or             useres         por
SFX K   or             user           por
SFX K   or             usermos        por
SFX K   or             userdes        por
SFX K   or             userem         por
SFX K   0              ia             por
SFX K   0              ias            por
SFX K   0               amos          por
SFX K   0               eis           por
SFX K   0              iam            por
SFX K   r              nde            por
SFX K   r              ndo            por
SFX K   r              sto            por
SFX K   r              sta            por
SFX K   r              stos           por
SFX K   r              stas           por
SFX K   0              es             por
SFX K   0              mos            por
SFX K   0              des            por
SFX K   0              em             por
SFX K   zer             o             fazer
SFX K   r              s              fazer
SFX K   zer            z              fazer
SFX K   r              mos            fazer
SFX K   r              is             fazer
SFX K   r              m              fazer
SFX K   er             ia             fazer
SFX K   er             ias            fazer
SFX K   er              amos          fazer
SFX K   er              eis           fazer
SFX K   er             iam            fazer
SFX K   azer           iz             fazer
SFX K   azer           izeste         fazer
SFX K   azer           ez             fazer
SFX K   azer           izemos         fazer
SFX K   azer           izestes        fazer
SFX K   azer           izeram         fazer
SFX K   azer           izera          fazer
SFX K   azer           izeras         fazer
SFX K   azer           iz ramos       fazer
SFX K   azer           iz reis        fazer
SFX K   zer            rei            fazer
SFX K   zer            r s            fazer
SFX K   zer            r              fazer
SFX K   zer            remos          fazer
SFX K   zer            reis           fazer
SFX K   zer            r o            fazer
SFX K   zer             a             fazer
SFX K   zer             as            fazer
SFX K   zer             amos          fazer
SFX K   zer             ais           fazer
SFX K   zer             am            fazer
SFX K   azer           izesse         fazer
SFX K   azer           izesses        fazer
SFX K   azer           iz ssemos      fazer
SFX K   azer           iz sseis       fazer
SFX K   azer           izessem        fazer
SFX K   azer           izer           fazer
SFX K   azer           izeres         fazer
SFX K   azer           izer           fazer
SFX K   azer           izermos        fazer
SFX K   azer           izerdes        fazer
SFX K   azer           izerem         fazer
SFX K   zer            ria            fazer
SFX K   zer            rias           fazer
SFX K   zer            r amos         fazer
SFX K   zer            r eis          fazer
SFX K   zer            riam           fazer
SFX K   r              i              fazer
SFX K   r              ndo            fazer
SFX K   azer           eito           fazer
SFX K   azer           eita           fazer
SFX K   azer           eitos          fazer
SFX K   azer           eitas          fazer
SFX K   0              es             fazer
SFX K   0              mos            fazer
SFX K   0              des            fazer
SFX K   0              em             fazer
SFX K   zer            go             dizer
SFX K   r              s              dizer
SFX K   zer            z              dizer
SFX K   r              mos            dizer
SFX K   r              is             dizer
